Utah statutes.
38-8-3.5.   Right to tow certain vehicles subject to lien.

(1)  If the property subject to a lien described in Section 38-3-2 is a vehicle, the occupant is in default for a continuous 60-day period, and the owner chose not to sell the vehicle under Section 38-8-3, the owner may have the vehicle towed from the self-storage facility by an independent towing carrier that is certified by the Department of Transportation as described in Section 72-9-602.

(2)  Within one day after the day on which a vehicle is towed under Subsection (1), the owner shall send written notice by certified mail, postage prepaid, to the occupant's last known address that states:

(a)  the date the vehicle was towed; and

(b)  the address and telephone number of the person that towed the vehicle.

(3)  An owner that has a vehicle towed under Subsection (1) is not liable for any damage that occurs to the vehicle after the independent towing carrier takes possession of the vehicle.



Enacted by Chapter 163, 2013 General Session

